Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Chapter 8

Trial Dockets

20-8-101. Priority of causes.

The clerk shall enter causes upon the clerk's trial docket in the order in which they become ready for trial, giving the cause first ready for trial, either by due course of law or consent of parties, priority of position on the docket.

If a number of causes become ready for trial at the same time, they shall be entered on the docket in the order of their commencement.

Code 1858, §§ 2945, 2946; Shan., §§ 4666, 4667; Code 1932, §§ 8794, 8795; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1207.

Cross-References. Setting cases for trial, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 40.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-40-2.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Trial, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Reform at the Lowest Level: A Model Statute for Small Claims Courts, Part III, 28 Vand. L. Rev. 747.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335.

Comparative Legislation. Dockets:

Ala. R.C.P. 79.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §17-8-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 510.070.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 7A-42.

Va. Code §§ 8.01-331 — 8.01-335.

Cited: Louisville & N. R. Co. v. Timmons, 116 Tenn. 29, 91 S.W. 1116, 1905 Tenn. LEXIS 3 (1906).

20-8-102. Style of case not to be changed by clerk.

The clerk of the court shall not change the style of any cause, or papers in the cause, without permission of the chancellor or judge presiding, after the cause has been docketed.

Acts 1879, ch. 114, § 1; Shan., § 4675; Code 1932, § 8801; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1208.

20-8-103. Order of trial.

Causes, except those given preference by law, thus docketed shall be tried and disposed of in their order, unless the parties consent to a different arrangement or rules of practice otherwise provide.

Code 1858, § 2947; Shan., § 4668; mod. Code 1932, § 8796; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1209.

Cross-References. Setting cases for trial, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 40.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Trial, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

20-8-104. Apportionment of causes.

The court may, in its discretion, direct the clerk to apportion the causes for as many days of the term as may be deemed necessary for their trial and disposition. This apportionment shall not affect legal priority.

Code 1858, § 2948; Shan., § 4672; mod. Code 1932, § 8800; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1210.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

20-8-105. Public causes advanced on docket.

It is the duty of the court to advance upon the docket causes the decision of which directly involves questions concerning the public revenues, whether of state, county or municipality, questions concerning the boundaries of counties, towns or cities, or concerning public officers as to their eligibility, qualifications or appointment, or their lawful functions, so that such cause may be heard and determined with the least delay consistent with the proper investigation of such causes upon their merits.

Acts 1871, ch. 125, § 1; 1879, ch. 79, § 4; Shan., § 4671; mod. Code 1932, § 8799; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1211.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 25.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335.

Collateral References. 75 Am. Jur. 2d Trial §§ 25, 26.

88 C.J.S. Trial § 33.

Appeal and Error
811.

20-8-106. Time for trial of cases involving state.

The trial judge of any of the courts of law or equity shall appoint any time that the judge deems proper for the trial of any civil cause in which the state is a party in interest, directly or in any other way. The cause may be so specifically set for trial, without reference to its relative position on the docket.

Acts 1867-1868, ch. 67, §§ 6, 7; Shan., §§ 4669, 4670; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8797, 8798; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1212.

Cross-References. Setting cases for trial, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 40.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335.